Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1024.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4b. new text end new text begin Animal feedlot. new text end new text begin (a) "Animal feedlot" means a lot or building or combination of lots and buildings intended for the confined feeding, breeding, raising, or holding of animals: new text end new text begin (1) that is specifically designed as a confinement area in which manure may accumulate; or new text end new text begin (2) where the concentration of animals is such that a vegetative cover cannot be maintained within the enclosure. new text end new text begin (b) Animal feedlot includes open lots used for feeding and rearing poultry, except that a lot with 12 or fewer chickens is not an animal feedlot. Animal feedlot does not include a pasture. new text end